src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX D ti       iose           ti        
SFX D          s                        
SFX D         ei                        
SFX D                                   
SFX D         e                         
SFX D          je                       
SFX D          j                        
SFX D         i               [^dt]     
SFX D t        i              t         
SFX D d       d i             d         
SFX D          ms                       
SFX D          m                        
SFX D         es                        
SFX D          mis                      
SFX D          se                       
SFX D  s      i               [^dt] s   
SFX D t s      i              t s       
SFX D d s     d i             d s       
SFX D  s       ms              s        
SFX D  s      es               s        
SFX D  s       mis             s        
SFX D  s       se              s        

NOSUGGEST !
