src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
Adamkus/D
afazija/D
aguonius/D
ai umas/D
aklys/D
akupres ra/D
al ja/D
aliejus/D
Alminta/D
Amaril /D
analitik /D
angliavandenilis/D
Antanin s/D
antkremzlis/D
ant alas/D
apatinis/BDN
apiply  l /D
apyvartos/D
Apolinarija/D
apskur l /D
arbatmedis/D
arkivyskupas/D
artikulas/D
asir /D
a tuntok /D
atgajumas/D
atletizmas/D
atpl  a/D
atskaitymas/D
atvira ird /D
augalija/D
aukl tojas/D
Aura/D
autodetal /D
autuvas/D
azimutas/D
baisis/D
baldas/D
baltanugar /D
baltukas/D
Banguolis/D
barnis/D
basius/D
ba nytinink /D
bej g /D
bendrata tis/D
berg dinys/D
Betygala/D
bilijonas/D
bir i kis/D
blaivininkas/D
bluostas/D
brailis/D
bried /D
bro i ra/D
buferis/D
bulgar /D
burlent /D
Butys/D
cementas/D
chirurgija/D
cipukas/D
daigintoja/D
daktiloskopija/D
dangus/D
Dargina/D
dar ovinink /D
Daugintas/D
Daukintas/D
d d /D
deizmas/D
demar as/D
derva/D
detonacija/D
didyst /D
dienra tis/D
dinamitas/D
dirvuol /D
dyglia uv /D
dokumentalumas/D
dorumas/D
dr sa/D
dresuotojas/D
drumzlinumas/D
dujintuvas/D
d msiurbis/D
durpyn /D
dvi sis/BDN
dvokla/D
efektyvumas/D
eidin /D
Eigminas/D
Einor /D
Eiv /D
ekspedicinink /D
Eladijus/D
elnias/D
energija/D
Erikas/D
Estela/D
Euzebijus/D
fakultetas/D
favoritas/D
filantropas/D
fizionomija/D
formalist /D
frezuotoja/D
gagara/D
gaivalas/D
Galinis/D
gamintoja/D
gardyb /D
garvilka/D
Gaudvin /D
Gedmin /D
Geistar /D
geltena/D
genocidas/D
germanizator /D
gestikuliacija/D
Gilvin /D
Gintautas/D
girininkija/D
gyliava/D
gyvumas/D
gludinys/D
gorila/D
grai tva/D
gra danka/D
greitumas/D
grikinukas/D
grytel /D
gr stuvis/D
guga/DENX
gurnas/D
Haroldas/D
hiacintas/D
Honkongas/D
idilija/D
ilgarankis/BDN
impresionistas/D
industrija/D
inscenizacija/D
interviu/D
Irvyd /D
i d k l /D
i karpa/D
i lie is/D
i radimas/D
i ti a/D
Iza/D
Janeli nas/D
jaunikis/D
Jemenas/D
Joleta/D
Jotau iai/D
Jul /D
juodis/D
J rat /D
kabaretas/D
kaimietis/D
kakofonija/D
Kalistas/D
Kaltan nai/D
kampin /D
Kangailas/D
Kap iamiestis/D
Karalius/D
karingumas/DN
kar inys/D
karvelinink /D
katalizatorius/D
kaulenis/D
Ka ukauskas/D
keliaviet /D
kent toja/D
ker umas/D
ketvirtakurs /D
kiau d jys/D
kikilis/D
kiniet /D
Kirmant /D
kitatautis/D
Klara/D
klebonas/D
klijingumas/D
klumpait /D
knygotyra/D
koleg /D
komentator /D
komunija/D
konkurent /D
kontrrevoliucija/D
korektorius/D
kosulys/D
krap tuk /D
kreg d n /D
kriauklas/D
kritesys/D
krosnilanda/D
Kubilius/D
k lymas/D
k ni kumas/D
kur galis/D
kurtas/D
kv darni kis/D
laidykl /D
lai kininkas/D
lakmedis/D
lankstumas/D
laukas/ADNQ
lavond m /D
legionier /D
lema/D
lentpj v /D
leukoz /D
liejinys/D
ligon /D
Linius/D
litografija/D
liustra/D
lygiavamzdis/BDN
lokena/D
Luko ius/D
maestras/D
mai ykl /D
maksimalistas/D
mamutas/D
Mantart /D
margin /D
mar alka/D
mastitas/D
ma aprot /D
mecenat /D
medkotis/D
meistr /D
membrana/D
merinos /D
metafora/D
met glis/D
miglap t /D
Milgauda/D
milvel /D
minkytojas/D
mirkseklis/D
mitukas/D
mokslas/D
monoliti kumas/D
moter n /D
mulk /D
Musninkai/D
nailonas/D
naratyvas/D
Nata/D
Naumant /D
negeroji/D
nemalon /D
neporakanopis/D
nervingumas/D
neuronas/D
niek i kumas/D
ni ronas/D
Norgilas/D
novatori kumas/D
numir lis/D
nuoilsis/D
nuoseklumas/D
nupiltuvas/D
nutaut lis/D
odontologas/D
onomastika/D
ordininkas/D
Osmundas/D
pabal l /D
pada in /D
paged l /D
pai yba/D
pakamp /D
pakojis/D
palai  n /D
palisandramedis/D
pam kl /D
Panemunis/D
papykis/D
parametras/D
parlamentaras/DN
pa aknys/D
pasen l /D
pa ytoja/D
pa on /D
Pasvalys/D
patologas/D
paunksn /D
pavilgas/D
pa ymys/D
Pel dnagiai/D
penkiadienis/BDN
per minys/D
pernugaris/D
pertaras/D
Petriukas/D
pietys/D
piktd iugis/D
pilkuon lis/D
pinkl /D
pirmoji/D
Pythonas/D
pla taka/D
plei tas/D
plienbetonis/D
plok t /D
plutonis/D
pok tas/D
pomidoras/D
porteris/D
povandeninink /D
pragmatik /D
pranci kon /D
prataka/D
prekyviet /D
pried lis/D
priemai a/D
prieskrandis/D
prievartautojas/D
privatinink /D
proguma/D
Protazas/D
prozopop ja/D
p kanugaris/D
puolena/D
purvagaud /D
pusinteligent /D
puspar is/D
p tikas/D
radiograma/D
ragintojas/D
raivulys/D
Ramys/D
rasakil /D
Raubonys/D
raupuotumas/D
Reda/D
regresija/D
relaksacija/D
rentinys/D
retrospektyvumas/D
rezultatyvumas/D
rifas/D
rink ja/D
ryk tel /D
roman /D
rubuil /D
r gtis/D
r pintinis/D
sabaliukas/D
sakuotnugar /D
salonas/D
samprata/D
sanitaras/D
sapaliotojas/D
s spyris/D
saunora/D
s varst /D
savisuk /D
s br /D
s klininkyst /D
semitolog /D
sentikis/D
Servacijus/D
sidabras/D
Sigut /D
Simonas/D
Sirmantas/D
sykas/D
Skalamintas/D
skarenis/D
skersak /D
skietmedis/D
skyrinink /D
Skomin /D
skryb lininkas/D
skustuvas/D
sl snuma/D
smailuma/D
smilkykl /D
snarglius/D
sodinukas/D
spalvininkyst /D
spengesys/D
sporin /D
sp da/D
sta ioki kumas/D
Sta k ni kis/D
stempl /D
stikliukas/D
stogelis/D
straublys/D
studija/D
sudarytoja/D
sukinys/D
sunkmena/D
s ro emis/D
suvalkietis/D
svarstininkas/D
Svirgauda/D
taikintojas/D
talonas/D
tapatumas/D
tarpiklis/D
tarpu akis/D
tauk lys/D
Tautmant /D
teisingumas/D
tembras/D
Ter /D
t va udys/D
tikrintuvas/D
tira uotojas/D
tyrai/D
Tomas/D
traknys/D
traukiklis/D
triatlonininkas/D
tri akis/BDN
try kyn /D
truput lis/D
tuokviet /D
tu  ia odyst /D
tv r /DPSXabcdefhklmnopqrtwx
ugnia ol /D
unksn /D
upynas/D
utopist /D
u kalas/D
U liekn /D
u sakov /D
u uojauta/D
Vadokliai/D
Vaidmin /D
vaikuotis/DT
vai intoja/D
vaitulys/D
Valda/D
Valiot /D
vambra/D
vandenvardis/D
varguomen /D
varpa/D
var ytoja/D
va ma/D
veiksnys/D
v liav l /D
Venci nai/D
verkuon l /D
ver eklis/D
v  mena/D
vidur iemis/D
vieningumas/D
vie butis/D
vikr nas/D
vilkas/D
viltas/ADNQ
Virbutas/D
vir pamatis/D
Visalg /D
vi tynas/D
Vyd /D
vynioklis/D
Vyten /D
vol /D
zaunytoja/D
zootechnik /D
